Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 2. Cancellation, Suspension, Revocation, or Limitation of Drivers’ Licenses.
Sec. 28.15.185.
Court revocation of a minor’s license to drive.

A person is subject to revocation, under (b) of this section, of the person’s driver’s license or permit, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license if the person

is at least 13 years of age but not yet 21 years of age and is convicted of or is adjudicated a delinquent minor by a court for misconduct involving a controlled substance under AS 11.71 or a municipal ordinance with substantially similar elements; or

is at least 13 years of age but not yet 18 years of age and is convicted of or is adjudicated a delinquent minor by a court for an offense involving the illegal use or possession of a firearm that is punishable under AS 11 or a municipal ordinance with substantially similar elements.

The court shall impose the revocation for an offense described in (a) of this section as follows:

for a first conviction or adjudication, the revocation may be for a period not to exceed 90 days;

for a second or subsequent conviction or adjudication, the revocation may be for a period not to exceed one year.

When a person described in (a) of this section has been convicted of or adjudicated a delinquent minor for an offense listed in (a) of this section, the court may, upon petition of the person, review the revocation and may restore the driver’s license, except a court may not restore the driver’s license until

at least one-half of the period of revocation imposed under this section has expired; and

the person has taken and successfully completed a state approved program of drug education or rehabilitation if convicted or adjudicated of misconduct involving a controlled substance under AS 11.71 or a municipal ordinance with substantially similar elements; however, this paragraph does not apply to a person who resides in an area that does not offer a state approved drug education or rehabilitation program or a person that the court determines does not need drug education or rehabilitation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

28.20.240

and

28.20.250

, upon conviction of an offense specified in (a) of this section, the department may not require proof of financial responsibility before restoring or issuing the person’s driver’s license.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 32 SLA 2016.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1988; am §§ 5, 6 ch 9 SLA 1995; am §§ 6, 7 ch 93 SLA 1998; am §§ 12, 13 ch 65 SLA 2001; am § 22 ch 32 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For hearings, see 2 AAC 93, art. 1.

For definitions, see 2 AAC 93, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, repealed (e).

Sec. 28.15.187.
Administrative revocation of a license to drive for use of false identification.

If a peace officer has probable cause based on personal observation that a person has used a driver’s license as fraudulent or false identification as prohibited by AS

04.16.060(d)

, the peace officer shall read a notice and deliver a copy to the person. The notice must advise that

the department intends to revoke the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license, or refuse to issue an original license to the person;

the person has the right to administrative review of the revocation or determination not to issue an original license;

if the person has a driver’s license or a nonresident privilege to drive, the notice itself is a temporary driver’s license that expires seven days after it is delivered to the person;

revocation of the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license, or a determination not to issue an original license takes effect seven days after delivery of the notice to the person unless the person, within seven days, requests an administrative review.

After reading the notice under (a) of this section, the peace officer shall seize the person’s driver’s license if it is in the person’s possession and shall deliver it to the department with a sworn report describing the circumstances under which it was seized.

Unless the person has requested an administrative review, the department shall revoke the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license, or refuse to issue an original license, effective seven days after delivery to the person of the notice required under (a) of this section, upon receipt of a sworn report of a peace officer

that the officer had probable cause based on personal observations that the person used a driver’s license as fraudulent or false identification as prohibited by AS

04.16.060(d)

;

that notice under (a) of this section was provided to the person; and

describing the circumstances surrounding the violation of AS

04.16.060(d)

.

The department shall impose the revocation required under this section

for a period of 60 days for a first revocation under this section; and

for a second or subsequent revocation under this section for a period of 12 months.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

28.20.240

and

28.20.250

, the department may not require proof of financial responsibility before restoring a driver’s license or privilege that is revoked under this section.

A license revocation imposed under this section shall be consecutive to a license revocation imposed under another provision of law.

History.

(§ 3 ch 50 SLA 1993)

Sec. 28.15.189.
Administrative review of revocation of license for use of false identification.

A person who has received a notice under AS

28.15.187(a)

may make a written request for administrative review of the department’s action. If the person’s driver’s license has not been previously surrendered to the department, it shall be surrendered to the department at the time the request for review is made.

A request for review of the department’s revocation under AS

28.15.187

shall be made within seven days after receipt of the notice under AS

28.15.187

or the right to review is waived and the action of the department under AS

28.15.187(c)

is final. If a written request for a review is made after expiration of the seven-day period, and if it is accompanied by the applicant’s verified statement explaining the failure to make a timely request for a review, the department shall receive and consider the request. If the department finds that the person was unable to make a timely request because of lack of actual notice of the revocation or because of factors of physical incapacity such as hospitalization or incarceration, the department shall waive the period of limitation, reopen the matter, and grant the review request.

Upon receipt of a request for review, if it appears that the person holds a valid driver’s license and that the driver’s license has been surrendered, the department shall issue a temporary driver’s permit that is valid until the scheduled date for the review. A person who has requested a review under this section may request, and the department may grant for good cause, a delay in the date of the hearing. If necessary, the department may issue additional temporary permits to stay the effective date of its action under AS

28.15.187(c)

until the final order after the review is issued.

A person who has requested a hearing under this section and who fails to appear at the hearing, for reasons other than lack of actual notice of the hearing or physical incapacity such as hospitalization or incarceration, waives the right to a hearing. The determination of the department that is based upon the officer’s report becomes final.

Notwithstanding AS

28.05.141(b)

, the hearing under this section shall be held telephonically unless the person requesting the hearing requests in writing that the hearing not be held telephonically.

A review under this section shall be held before a hearing officer designated by the commissioner. The hearing officer shall have authority to

administer oaths and affirmations;

examine witnesses and take testimony;

receive relevant evidence;

issue subpoenas, take depositions, or cause depositions or interrogatories to be taken;

regulate the course and conduct of the hearing;

make a final ruling on the issue.

The hearing for review of a revocation by the department under AS

28.15.187

shall be limited to the issue of whether the person used a driver’s license as fraudulent or false identification as prohibited by AS

04.16.060(d)

.

The determination of the hearing officer may be based upon the sworn report of a peace officer, if the sworn report is supported by probable cause based on personal observations as required under AS

28.15.187(a)

. The peace officer need not be present at the hearing unless either the person requesting the hearing or the hearing officer requests in writing before the hearing that the officer be present. If in the course of the hearing it becomes apparent that the testimony of the peace officer is necessary to enable the hearing officer to resolve disputed issues of fact, the hearing shall be continued to allow the attendance of the peace officer.

Upon written request of the person requesting the hearing, the hearing officer shall stay the hearing until the conclusion of related criminal proceedings. If the person requesting the hearing does not request a stay, testimony given by the person at the hearing is admissible against the person in a criminal trial.

If the issue set out in (g) of this section is determined in the affirmative by a preponderance of the evidence, the hearing officer shall sustain the action of the department. If the issue is determined in the negative, the department’s revocation action shall be rescinded.

If the action of the department in revoking a nonresident’s privilege to drive a motor vehicle is not administratively contested by the nonresident driver or if the departmental action is sustained by the hearing officer, the department shall give written notice of action taken to the motor vehicle administrator of the state of the person’s residence and to any state in which that person has a driver’s license.

Within 30 days of the issuance of the final determination of the department, a person aggrieved by the determination may file an appeal in superior court for judicial review of the hearing officer’s determination. The judicial review shall be on the record without taking additional testimony. The court may reverse the department’s determination if the court finds that the department misinterpreted the law, acted in an arbitrary and capricious manner, or made a determination unsupported by the evidence in the record.

The filing of an appeal under (l) of this section or a petition for review does not automatically stay the department’s order or revocation. The court may grant a stay of the order or revocation under the applicable rules of court, after a motion and hearing, and upon a finding that there is a reasonable probability that the petitioner will prevail on the merits and that the petitioner will suffer irreparable harm if the order is not stayed.

History.

(§ 3 ch 50 SLA 1993)

Sec. 28.15.190.
Forwarding surrendered license. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.191.
Court and parole board reports to department; surrender of license or identification card.

A court that convicts a person of an offense under this title or a regulation adopted under this title, or another law or regulation of this state or a municipal ordinance that regulates the driving of vehicles shall forward a record of the conviction to the department within five working days. A conviction of a standing or parking offense need not be reported.

A conviction on a plea of nolo contendere accepted by the court or a forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure a defendant’s appearance in court that has not been vacated is equivalent to a conviction for purposes of this chapter.

A court that suspends, revokes, or limits a driver’s license shall require the surrender of the license, and shall immediately forward it to the department with the record of conviction and notification of the effective date of the suspension, revocation, or limitation as determined under AS

28.15.211(b)

.

A court that limits a driver’s license, in addition to the actions required under (c) of this section, shall issue to the licensee a form specifying the court’s limitations imposed upon a person’s driver’s license, and shall immediately forward to the department a copy of the limitations imposed upon the license.

A court shall report to the department every change of name authorized by it, and the name, address, age, description, and driver’s license number if available, of every person adjudged to be afflicted with or suffering from a mental disability or disease, or to be an habitual user of alcohol or another drug. The department shall prescribe and furnish the forms for making these reports.

A municipality that accepts a fine payment after a plea of no contest to a charge of a violation of a municipal ordinance for which a scheduled fine has been established shall forward a record of the payment to the department; however, a conviction for a standing or parking offense need not be reported.

A court that has ordered a person to refrain from consuming alcoholic beverages as part of a sentence for conviction of a crime under AS

28.35.030

,

28.35.032

, or a similar municipal ordinance or as a condition of probation or parole following a conviction under those sections or a similar municipal ordinance, or as a condition of probation or parole for any other crime shall

require the surrender of the person’s license and identification card and forward the license and identification card to the department;

report the order to the department within two days; and

inform the person that the person’s license and identification card are subject to cancellation under AS

28.15.161

and AS

18.65.310

and, if the person is otherwise qualified to receive a license or identification card, when the person obtains a new license or identification card, the license or identification card must list the restriction imposed by AS

04.16.160

for the period of probation or parole.

The board of parole shall notify the department within two days whenever a person has been ordered to refrain from consuming alcoholic beverages as a condition of parole, shall require the person to surrender the person’s license and identification card, and shall inform the person that the person’s license and identification card are subject to cancellation under AS

28.15.161

and AS

18.65.310

, and that, if the person is otherwise qualified to receive a license or identification card, when the person obtains a new license or identification card, the license or identification card must list the restriction imposed by AS

04.16.160

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 76 SLA 1987; am § 14 ch 60 SLA 2002; am § 29 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 30 ch 75 SLA 2008; am § 18 ch 32 SLA 2016; am § 102 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to subsection (g), see sec. 185(d)(4), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, in (a), deleted “, or a violation of AS

14.16.050

” preceding “shall forward”.

The second 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in the introductory language of (g), inserted “, or as a condition of probation or parole for any other crime” near the end.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 43(a), ch. 75, SLA 2008 provides that the 2008 amendment of (a) of this section “[applies] to an offense occurring on or after July 1, 2008.”

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008 explicitly declares that sec. 30, ch. 75, SLA 2008, amending (a) of this section, is subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 28.15.200.
Suspending license upon conviction in another jurisdiction. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.201.
Limitation of driver’s license.

A court of competent jurisdiction revoking a person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license under AS

28.15.181(b)

may, for good cause, impose limitations upon the driver’s license of a person that will enable the person to earn a livelihood without excessive risk or danger to the public. A limitation may not be placed upon a driver’s license until after a review has been made of the person’s driving record and other relevant information, and a limitation may not be imposed when a statute specifically prohibits the limitation of a license for a violation of its provisions.

A court imposing a limitation under (a) of this section shall

require certification of employment;

require proof of enrollment in and compliance with or completion of an alcoholism treatment program when appropriate;

require the surrender of the driver’s license; and

issue to the licensee a certificate valid for the duration of the limitation.

After the termination of a limitation as shown on the certificate issued under (b) of this section, the license of a person on whom a limitation was imposed is revoked until the person receives a new license meeting the requirements set out in AS

28.15.211

.

A court revoking a driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license under AS

28.15.181(c)

, or the department when revoking a driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license under AS

28.15.165(c)

, may grant limited license privileges if

the revocation was for a misdemeanor conviction under AS

28.35.030

or a similar municipal ordinance and not for a violation of AS

28.35.032

;

the person

has not been previously convicted and the limited license is not granted during the first 30 days of the period of revocation; or

has been previously convicted and the limited license is not granted during the first 90 days of the period of revocation;

the court or department requires the person to use an ignition interlock device during the period of the limited license whenever the person operates a motor vehicle in a community not included in the list published by the department under AS

28.22.011(b)

and, when applicable,

the person provides proof of installation of the ignition interlock device on every vehicle the person operates;

the person signs an affidavit acknowledging that

operation by the person of a vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock device is subject to penalties for driving with a revoked license;

circumventing or tampering with the ignition interlock device is a class A misdemeanor; and

the person is required to maintain the ignition interlock device throughout the period of the limited license, to keep up-to-date records in each vehicle showing that any required service and calibration is current, and to produce those records immediately on request;

the person is enrolled in and is in compliance with or has successfully completed the alcoholism screening, evaluation, referral, and program requirements of the Department of Health and Social Services under AS

28.35.030(h)

;

the person provides proof of insurance as required by AS

28.20.230

and

28.20.240

; and

the person has not previously been convicted of violating the limitations of an ignition interlock limited license or been convicted of violating the provisions of AS

28.35.030

or

28.35.032

while on probation for a violation of those sections.

If a person is required to use an ignition interlock device as a condition of a limited license under this section and the device prevents a vehicle from being operated, the person has not violated the requirements of the limited license by attempting to operate the vehicle.

In (d)(2) of this section, “previously convicted” has the meaning given in AS

28.35.030

and also includes convictions under laws presuming that the person was under the influence of intoxicating liquor if there was 0.08 percent or more by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood.

Notwithstanding (d) of this section, a court revoking a driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license under AS

28.15.181(c)

, or the department when revoking a driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license under AS

28.15.165(c)

, may grant limited license privileges if

the revocation was for a felony conviction under AS

28.35.030

;

the person is participating in and has successfully participated for at least six months in, or has successfully completed, a court-ordered treatment program under AS

28.35.028

, and submits verification acceptable to the department;

the person provides proof of insurance as required by AS

28.20.230

and

28.20.240

;

the person is required to use an ignition interlock device during the period of the limited license whenever the person operates a motor vehicle in a community not included in the list published by the department under AS

28.22.011(b)

and, when applicable,

the person provides proof of installation of the ignition interlock device on every vehicle the person operates;

the person signs an affidavit acknowledging that

operation by the person of a vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock device is subject to penalties for driving with a revoked license;

circumventing or tampering with the ignition interlock device is a class A misdemeanor; and

the person is required to maintain the ignition interlock device throughout the period of the limited license, to keep up-to-date records in each vehicle showing that any required service and calibration is current, and to produce those records immediately on request;

the person has not previously been granted a limited license under this section and had the license revoked under (j) of this section.

Notwithstanding (g)(2) of this section, if a person resides in a community where a court-ordered treatment program under AS

28.35.028

is not available, the person shall

provide proof to the court that the person has successfully completed a rehabilitative treatment program appropriate for the person’s alcohol or substance abuse condition; the program must

include planning and treatment for alcohol or drug addiction;

include emphasis on personal responsibility;

require payment of restitution to victims and completion of community work service;

include physician-approved treatment of physical addiction and treatment of the psychological causes of addiction; and

include a monitoring program and physical placement or housing in communities where the court finds that a monitoring program and placement or housing is available;

provide proof by clear and convincing evidence to the court that the person is currently sober and has maintained sobriety for a period of at least 18 months; and

provide written notice to the district attorney’s office of the person’s request for a limited license under this section.

A person is not entitled to court-appointed counsel under (h) of this section.

The court or the department may immediately revoke a limited license granted under (g) of this section if the person is convicted of a violation of AS

28.35.030

or

28.35.032

or a similar law or ordinance of this or another jurisdiction or if the person is not in compliance with a court-ordered treatment program under AS

28.35.028

or a rehabilitative treatment program under (h) of this section.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 10, 11 ch 117 SLA 1982; am §§ 8, 9 ch 77 SLA 1983; am §§ 16 — 18 ch 119 SLA 1990; am § 12 ch 3 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 1993; am § 15 ch 60 SLA 2002; am §§ 2, 3 ch 126 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 56 SLA 2006; am §§ 3, 4 ch 97 SLA 2008; am § 103 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1990, the word “five” was substituted for “six” in the last sentence of former (d) of this section to correct a manifest error in § 18, ch. 119, SLA 1990. Subsection (e) was enacted as (f); relettered in 2008, at which time subsection (e) was relettered as (f).

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(l)(3), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For classified driver's licenses, see 2 AAC 90, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, added (g) — (j).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 7, ch. 126, SLA 2004, provides that the 2004 amendments of this section apply “to persons seeking limited licenses as a result of revocations for convictions occurring before, on, or after June 30, 2004.”

Sec. 28.15.210.
Mandatory revocation. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.211.
Periods of limitation, suspension, revocation, or disqualification; opportunity for hearing and surrender of license.

Except for a point system suspension or revocation under AS

28.15.221

—

28.15.241

and unless provided otherwise by law, and unless the suspension or revocation was for a cause that has been removed, a person whose driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license has been suspended or revoked may not apply for a new license, and the person’s driving privilege may not be restored, until the expiration of

30 days from the date on which the license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license was suspended or revoked for a first conviction of the particular offense from which the suspension or revocation resulted;

90 days from the date on which the license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license was suspended or revoked for a second conviction within 12 consecutive months of the same offense from which the suspension or revocation resulted;

one year from the date on which the license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license was suspended or revoked for a third or subsequent conviction within 12 consecutive months of the same offense from which the suspension or revocation resulted.

A limitation, suspension, or revocation of a driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license or a disqualification imposed by a court or the department takes effect on the date of final judgment, except that if another court or department limitation, suspension, disqualification, or revocation is in effect on the date of final judgment, the effective date of the last imposed limitation, suspension, disqualification, or revocation is at the end of the last day of the previous limitation, suspension, disqualification, or revocation unless the court or department specifies otherwise.

At the end of a period of suspension or limitation, when that limitation follows a suspension, the person whose license has been suspended or limited may apply to the department and, upon payment of the proper fees, including a reinstatement fee, be issued a duplicate driver’s license if the person is otherwise entitled to the license under this title.

At the end of a period of revocation or limitation following a revocation, a person whose driver’s license has been revoked may apply to the department for the issuance of a new license, but shall submit to reexamination, pay all required fees including a reinstatement fee, and, if the license was revoked under AS

28.15.181(a)(5)

or (8), submit proof to the court or the department that the person has met the alcoholism screening, evaluation, referral, and program requirements of the Department of Health and Social Services under AS

28.35.030(h)

.

At the end of a period of limitation, suspension, or revocation under this chapter, the department may not issue a driver’s license or a duplicate driver’s license to the licensee until the licensee has complied with AS 28.20 relating to proof of financial responsibility.

Unless otherwise provided by law, periods of limitation shall be made at the discretion of the court.

Except as provided under AS

28.15.183

(h), the department may not issue a new license or reissue a license to a person whose driver’s license has been revoked under AS

28.15.183

or

28.15.185

unless the person, if required to participate in a juvenile alcohol safety action program, has successfully completed any education or treatment recommended. In this subsection, “juvenile alcohol safety action program” has the meaning given in AS

04.21.080

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 12 ch 117 SLA 1982; am § 25 ch 77 SLA 1983; am § 7 ch 70 SLA 1984; am §§ 19, 20 ch 119 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 59 SLA 1993; am §§ 2, 3 ch 71 SLA 1994; am § 8 ch 93 SLA 1998; am § 14 ch 65 SLA 2001; am § 16 ch 60 SLA 2002; am §§ 13, 14 ch 23 SLA 2007; am § 7 ch 86 SLA 2010; am § 19 ch 32 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, in (g), substituted “has the meaning given in AS

04.21.080

” for “has the meaning given in AS

04.16.050

”.

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, in (g), deleted “AS

04.16.050

” preceding “AS

28.15.183

” and made a related change.

Sec. 28.15.219.
Definitions.

In AS

28.15.161

—

28.15.219

,

“disqualification” has the meaning given in AS

28.33.190

;

“disqualified” has the meaning given in AS

28.33.190

;

“disqualify” means that a person’s privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle is withdrawn.

History.

(§ 13 ch 3 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized upon enactment to alphabetize the defined terms.

Sec. 28.15.220.
Discretionary suspension, etc. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]